Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1

Board of Medical Examiners

63-6-101. Creation — Composition — Administrative support.

There shall be a board to be known as the board of medical examiners, referred to in this chapter as the “board,” to consist of twelve (12) members. Nine (9) members shall be duly licensed physicians, each of whom must meet the following qualifications:

Graduation from a medical school whose curriculum is substantially similar to, and whose educational standards are as high as that of, the medical department of the University of Tennessee, as published at the time of its extant catalogue; and

Not less than six (6) years experience in the practice of either medicine or surgery or both.

Three (3) members shall be nonphysicians who are consumers of health care and who neither own nor have any financial or other interest in any health care facility or business or school of medicine or other allied health care practitioner educational program and who shall represent the public at large.

It shall be the board's duty to examine the qualifications of all applicants for certification of fitness to practice medicine or surgery in this state, to conduct disciplinary hearings, and to make such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out and make effective this chapter. Any rules and regulations promulgated by the board shall comply with all requirements of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. No member shall be employed by or be a member of the governing body of, or have a financial interest in, any medical school, college or university of the state or of any school, college or university in which allied health care practitioners who are under the regulation of the board receive their qualifying education.

The board is authorized to issue advisory private letter rulings to any affected licensee who makes such a request regarding any matters within the board's primary jurisdiction. Such private letter ruling shall only affect the licensee making such inquiry and shall have no precedential value for any other inquiry or future contested case to come before the board. Any dispute regarding a private letter ruling may, if the board chooses to do so, be resolved pursuant to the declaratory order provisions of § 4-5-223.

The board shall receive administrative support from the division of health related boards in the department of health, referred to as the “division” in this chapter.

Acts 1901, ch. 78, § 2; Shan., § 3096a14; Code 1932, § 6919; Acts 1945, ch. 181, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 9, §§ 2-4, 9; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6919; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-601; Acts 1982, ch. 905, § 1; 1984, ch. 937, § 26; 1993, ch. 404, § 1; 1996, ch. 1043, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of health related boards in the department of health. See §§ 63-1-131 — 63-1-133 and 68-1-101.

The board of medical examiners, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-244.

Cross-References. Abortion, title 39, ch. 15, part 2.

Health maintenance organizations exempt from chapter, § 56-32-121.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Prevention of HIV transmission, rulemaking authority, § 68-11-222.

Regulation of health and related facilities, title 68, ch. 11, part 2.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

Uncovering the Silent Victims of the American Medical Liability System, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 151 (2014).

United States v. Caronia: How True Does “Truthful” Have to Be?, 67 Vand. L. Rev. En Banc 157 (2014).

Attorney General Opinions. Even though the Tennessee Medical Practice Act contains no express language authorizing the Board of Medical Examiners to regulate the facilities at which physicians practice, unless provided otherwise by law or Board regulation, individual physician practice requirements and standards apply to a physician's practice of medicine in any setting, including a medical clinic, OAG 04-128 (8/11/04).

63-6-102. Appointment — Terms — Vacancies — Removal.

The members of the board shall be appointed by the governor for terms of five (5) years' duration, which terms shall commence on May 1 and expire on April 30, five (5) years thereafter. All board members subsequently added to the board after May 2, 1993, shall be appointed so as to serve staggered terms of from one (1) to four (4) years, with one (1) member appointed to a one-year term, the second member appointed to a two-year term, the third member appointed to a three-year term, and the fourth member appointed to serve a four-year term.

The members appointed by the governor in 1988 shall be appointed as follows:

One (1) member shall be appointed to a one-year term expiring on April 30, 1989;

One (1) member shall be appointed to a two-year term expiring on April 30, 1990;

One (1) member shall be appointed to a three-year term expiring on April 30, 1991;

One (1) member shall be appointed to a four-year term expiring on April 30, 1992; and

One (1) member shall be appointed to a five-year term expiring on April 30, 1993.

Members of the board shall, upon expiration of their terms of office, be eligible for reappointment to successive terms.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall give due regard to the geographic distribution of the membership of the board to assure, to the extent feasible, that all grand divisions of the state are adequately represented on the board.

Board members may be selected from lists of qualified persons submitted to the governor by interested medical groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Medical Association. The governor shall consult with such groups to determine qualified persons to fill the positions on the board.

All vacancies occurring on the board by reason of death or resignation shall be filled by the board itself for the unexpired term.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall, to the extent feasible, strive to ensure the full twelve-member board is composed of at least one (1) person who is sixty (60) years of age or older, one (1) person who is female and one (1) person who is an African-American.

When a board member is absent without excuse from the board business portion of three (3) meetings within any twelve-month period of time, that member shall, after formal action by the board, be removed from office by the governor. A new member shall be appointed by the governor to serve out the remaining term of the member being replaced. An absence shall be deemed excused if it is caused by a health problem or condition verified in writing by a physician or by an accident or similar unforeseen tragedy or event immediately prior to or during the board meeting.

Acts 1901, ch. 78, § 3; Shan., § 3609a15; Code 1932, § 6920; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-602; Acts 1988, ch. 790, § 1; 1988, ch. 1013, § 43; 1993, ch. 404, §§ 2, 3; 2006, ch. 531, § 1; 2012, ch. 650, § 3.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

63-6-103. Officers — Quorum.

The board is authorized to elect from its own members a president and secretary and to create such other officers as may be necessary for its efficient operations.

For purposes of conducting administrative business and promulgating rules and regulations, seven (7) members shall constitute a quorum, and the board shall meet at least twice a year to conduct such administrative business. A majority vote of the members present at the business meetings shall be required to authorize board action on any board business. For purposes of contested case hearings and disciplinary matters, three (3) or more members shall constitute a quorum; and the board president is authorized, when it is deemed necessary, to split the board into panels of three (3) or more, each to conduct contested case hearings or disciplinary matters. A majority vote of the members present on any duly constituted panel shall be required to authorize board action in disciplinary matters and contested case hearings. The board president shall have the authority to appoint board members to serve, as necessary, on the panels regardless of the grand division from which the appointed member was chosen or the member's status as a physician or nonphysician member. The existence of a nonphysician board member creates no rights in any individual concerning the composition of any panel in any disciplinary matter or contested case hearing. Notwithstanding § 4-5-314(e) to the contrary, unavailability of a member of any panel before rendition of a final order shall not require substitution of another member unless the unavailability results in there being less than the quorum required by this section for contested case hearings or disciplinary matters. Any substitute required shall use any existing record and may conduct any further proceedings as is necessary in the interest of justice.

Acts 1901, ch. 78, § 4; Shan., § 3609a16; Code 1932, § 6921; Acts 1978, ch. 628, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-603; Acts 1982, ch. 905, § 2; 1993, ch. 404, § 4; 1995, ch. 329, § 2; 2004, ch. 677, § 3.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

63-6-104. Meetings — Compensation — Disposition of receipts — Operating expenses.

All regular meetings of the board shall be held upon the call of the president.

The members of the board shall be entitled to a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day's service in attending meetings of the board, as provided in this section, and for conducting examinations for professional certificates and other administrative functions of the board and necessary expenses for traveling and subsistence while attending such meetings. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The board shall pay all money received by it into the state treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration shall make such allotments out of the general fund as the commissioner may deem proper for the necessary and proper expenses of the board, and no expenditure shall be made by the board unless and until such allotment has been made by the commissioner. Such allotment shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of this state.

Acts 1901, ch. 78, § 5; Shan., § 3609a17; mod. Code 1932, § 6922; Acts 1945, ch. 181, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 6922; Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 13; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1975, ch. 355, § 13; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(113); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-604; Acts 1993, ch. 404, § 5.

63-6-105. Online registry for medical spas — Annual fee authorized.

The board of medical examiners, in consultation with the board of osteopathic examination, shall establish and maintain an online registry for medical spas as defined in § 63-1-153, and, notwithstanding § 63-1-153, the registry shall include any physician-owned practice that advertises or holds itself out as a medical spa or a physician-owned practice that primarily engages in the performance of elective cosmetic medical services. The online registry shall include, at a minimum, the following information:

The name and physical address of the medical spa;

The name of the medical director or supervising physician, the medical license number of the director or supervising physician, and the designation as a medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy; and

Certification information of the medical director or supervising physician as required by § 63-1-153(b) and (c).

Any medical director or supervising physician who is responsible for or supervises a medical spa shall provide the board of medical examiners or the board of osteopathic examination with the information described in subsection (a); provided, that the medical director or supervising physician for a medical spa in existence prior to January 1, 2017, shall submit the required information to the appropriate board prior to that date.

The board of medical examiners and the board of osteopathic examination shall post, in conspicuous size and type, notice of the requirements of this section on the website of each board.

In order to offset the cost of implementing this section, the board of medical examiners, in consultation with the board of osteopathic examination, is authorized to promulgate rules to set an annual fee to be assessed on medical spas that are listed on the online registry.

Acts 2015, ch. 494, § 1; 2016, ch. 956, §§ 1, 2.